Maine, session 132, LD704.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §490-X, as amended by PL 2007, c. 297, §8 and PL 2011, c. 682,
§38, is further amended by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, a person exempt from the
requirements of this article that is operating a quarry one acre in size or less; that is
operating a quarry that has a total excavated area, including adjacent parcels under a
common owner or operator, that is one acre in size or less; or that is operating a quarry and
conducting an excavation or grading preliminary to a construction project shall comply
with the blasting notification requirements under section 490-Z, subsection 14, paragraph
O if the person intends to conduct blasting at that quarry or as part of that excavation or
grading.
Page 1 - 132LR2248(03)